Utah statutes.
48-3a-106.   Governing law.

The law of this state governs:

(1)  the internal affairs of a limited liability company; and

(2)  the liability of a member as member and a manager as manager for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

